Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the State-Tribal Cooperative Agreements Act:

(1) Agreement shall mean an agreement authorized under section 13-1503;

(2) Public agency shall mean any political subdivision, including any municipality, county, school district, or agency or department of the state; and

(3) Tribal government shall mean the officially recognized government of any Indian tribe, nation, or other organized group or community located in the state exercising self-government powers and recognized as eligible for services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians or any Indian tribe located in the state and recognized as an Indian tribe by the state.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 2.